Tennessee, session 114, SB1885.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 15-2-129, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting instead:
The month of February of each year must be observed as "Tennessee
Songwriters Month" to promote Tennessee's musical heritage by recognizing the
contributions of past and present songwriters to this state.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1885
010052
- 1 -